Hawaii, session 2026, HB2006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that pregnancy and early childhood are the most financially fragile periods in a family's life, yet also the most critical for a child's long-term development.  Scientific research and global experience demonstrate that direct support during these formative years yields lifelong benefits for children and society as a whole.  The legislature further finds that while over one hundred forty countries - representing seventy per cent of the world - provide direct child benefits, Hawaii continues to see alarming rates of economic instability among new families, including the highest concentration of houseless individuals being infants. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to establish the Hawaii Rx kids program to provide direct financial support to all expectant mothers, ensuring every child in the State has a healthy and secure start to life. SECTION 2.  Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346-     Hawaii Rx kids program; expectant mothers; households; payments.  (a)  The department shall establish and administer a Hawaii Rx kids program to improve the economic stability of households with very young children who reside in the State. (b) The Hawaii Rx kids program shall provide: (1)  A one-time unconditional payment of $1,500 to each expectant mother during pregnancy; (2)  Six monthly payments of $500 beginning at the child's birth and continuing through the child's sixth month of life; and (3)  Subject to available funds, six additional monthly payments of $500 through the child's twelfth month of life; provided that the department may make cost-of-living adjustments to the payment amounts. (c)  The department may contract with a third-party administrator to operate and manage the Hawaii Rx kids program; provided that the cost of administering the program shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the total program costs. (d)  Any plan for expenditure of temporary assistance for needy families funds developed pursuant to section 346‑51.5(b)(1) shall be updated to account for expenditures for household payments.  The expenditure of funds for the administration of household payments shall be exempt from chapters 103D and 103F.  Payments under the program that are sourced from temporary assistance for needy families funds may only be made to expectant mothers: (1)  Who qualify for benefits under the State's medicaid program; or (2)  Whose family income does not exceed three hundred per cent of the federal poverty level for a family of applicable size, including the expected unborn child or children. (e)  The department may establish rules as necessary pursuant to chapter 91 for the administration of the program." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________